el: Υλικό υαλοκάλυψης: Ακρυλικό; Γυαλί; Κανένα; Πλαστικό; Άλλο
tr: Cam kaplama malzemesi: Akrilik; Cam; Yok; Plastik; Diğer
fi: Lasitusmateriaali: Akryyli; Lasi; Ei mitään; Muovi; Muu
hr-HR: Materijal za ostakljivanje: Akril; Staklo; Nema; Plastika; Ostalo
bg-BG: Гланциращ материал: Акрил; Стъкло; Няма; Пластмаса; Друго
ja: グレージング材: アクリル; ガラス; なし; プラスチック; その他
ko: 유리 덮개 재질: 아크릴; 유리; 없음; 플라스틱; 기타
nb: Glaseringsmateriale: Akryl; Glass; Ingen; Plast; Annet
ru: Материал остекления: Акрил; Стекло; Нет; Пластик; Другой
sk-SK: Zasklievací materiál: Akryl; Sklo; Žiadny; Plast; Iné
es: Material de acristalamiento: Acrílico; Vidrio; Ninguno; Plástico; Otros
zh-TW: 鑲嵌材質: 壓克力; 玻璃; 無; 塑膠; 其他
fr: Type de vitrage: Acrylique; Verre; Aucune; Plastique; Autre
pl: Materiał tworzywa szklistego: Akryl; Szkło; Brak; Tworzywo sztuczne; Pozostałe
sl-SI: Material za premaz: Akril; Steklo; Brez; Plastika; Druga
hu: Bevonóanyag: Akril; Üveg; Egyik sem; Műanyag; Egyéb
cs: Materiál přední strany: Akryl; Sklo; Bez glazury; Plast; Jiné
nl: Beglazingsmateriaal: Acryl; Glas; Geen; Plastic; Overig
da: Glasmateriale: Akryl; Glas; Ingen; Plast; Andet
lt-LT: Įstiklinimo medžiaga: Akrilas; Stiklas; Nėra; Plastikas; Kita
pt-BR: Material de envidraçamento: Acrílico; Vidro; Nenhum; Plástico; Outro
zh-CN: 玻璃材质: 亚克力; 玻璃; 无; 塑料; 其他
de: Verglasungsmaterial: Acryl; Glas; Keine; Kunststoff; Sonstiges
it: Materiale della lastra: Acrilico; Vetro; Nessuna; Plastica; Altro
pt-PT: Material de vidragem: Acrílico; Vidro; Nenhum; Plástico; Outro
ro-RO: Material de protecție: Acrilic; Sticlă; Niciuna; Plastic; Altele
th: วัสดุทำกระจก: อะคริลิก; แก้ว; ไม่มี; พลาสติก; อื่นๆ
vi: Vật liệu kính: Acrylic; Thủy tinh; Không có; Nhựa; Khác
sv: Glasningsmaterial: Akryl; Glas; Inga; Plast; Övrigt
en: Glazing material: Acrylic; Glass; None; Plastic; Other